Colorado statutes. TITLE 44 Revenue - Regulation of Activities
PART 12
RESPONSIBLE VENDOR STANDARDS

44-10-1201. Responsible vendor program - standards - designation.

A person who wants to offer a responsible medical or retail marijuana vendor server and seller training program must submit an application to the state licensing authority for approval, which program is referred to in this part 12 as an "approved training program". The state licensing authority, in consultation with the department of public health and environment, shall approve the submitted program if the submitted program meets the minimum criteria described in subsection (2) of this section. The department of public health and environment shall review each submitted program and shall provide the state licensing authority with the department's analysis of whether the portions of the program related to the department's oversight meet the minimum criteria described in this section.

An approved training program must contain, at a minimum, the following standards and be taught in a classroom setting in a minimum of a two-hour period:

Program standards that specify, at a minimum, who must attend, the time frame for new staff to attend, recertification requirements, record keeping, testing and assessment protocols, and effectiveness evaluations; and

A core curriculum of pertinent statutory and regulatory provisions, which curriculum includes but need not be limited to:

Information on required licenses, age requirements, patient registry cards issued by the department of public health and environment, maintenance of records, privacy issues, and unlawful acts;

Administrative and criminal liability and license and court sanctions;

Statutory and regulatory requirements for employees and owners;

(III.5) Statutory and regulatory requirements related to marijuana delivery;

Acceptable forms of identification, including patient registry cards and associated documents and procedures;

Local and state licensing and enforcement, which may include but need not be limited to key statutes and rules affecting patients, owners, managers, and employees; and

Information on serving size, THC and cannabinoid potency, and impairment.

When promulgating program standards pursuant to subsection (2) of this section, the state licensing authority shall consider input from other state agencies, local jurisdictions, the medical and retail marijuana industry, and any other state or national seller server program.

A provider of an approved training program shall maintain its training records at its principal place of business during the applicable year and for the preceding three years, and the provider shall make the records available for inspection by the licensing authority during normal business hours.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2933, § 5, effective January 1, 2020; (2)(b)(IV) and (2)(b)(V) amended and (2)(b)(VI) added, (HB 19-1230), ch. 340, p. 3126, § 22, effective January 1, 2020.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-110 as it existed prior to 2020.

44-10-1202. Responsible vendor - designation.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective until January 1, 2023.]

A medical marijuana business or a retail marijuana business licensed pursuant to this article 10 may receive a responsible vendor designation from the program vendor after successfully completing a responsible medical or retail marijuana vendor server and seller training program approved by the state licensing authority. A responsible vendor designation is valid for two years from the date of issuance.

Successful completion of an approved training program is achieved when the program has been attended by and, as determined by the program provider, satisfactorily completed by all employees selling and handling medical or retail marijuana, all managers, and all resident on-site owners, if any.

In order to maintain the responsible vendor designation, the licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business must have each new employee who sells or handles medical or retail marijuana, manager, or resident on-site owner attend and satisfactorily complete a responsible medical or retail marijuana vendor server and seller training program within ninety days after being employed or becoming an owner. The licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business shall maintain documentation of completion of the program by new employees, managers, or owners.

A licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business that receives a responsible vendor designation from the program vendor shall maintain information on all persons licensed pursuant to this article 10 who are in its employment and who have been trained in an approved training program. The information includes the date, place, time, and duration of training and a list of all licensed persons attending each specific training class, which class includes a training examination or assessment that demonstrates proficiency.

If a local or state licensing authority initiates an administrative action against a licensee who has complied with the requirements of this section and has been designated a responsible vendor, the licensing authority shall consider the designation as a mitigating factor when imposing sanctions or penalties on the licensee.

44-10-1202. Responsible vendor - designation.

[Editor's note: This version of this section is effective January 1, 2023.]

A person or an employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner licensed pursuant to this article 10 may receive a responsible vendor designation. A program vendor shall provide a person or an employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner licensed pursuant to this article 10 a responsible vendor designation after the person, employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner successfully completes the approved training program. A responsible vendor designation is valid for two years from the date of issuance. In order to maintain a responsible vendor designation, a person or an employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner licensed pursuant to this article 10 shall successfully complete an approved training program every two years. If an employee or manager with a responsible vendor designation leaves the employment of a licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business and is employed by another licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business, the employee or manager does not have to receive a new responsible vendor designation until the employee's or manager's current responsible vendor designation expires.

Successful completion of an approved training program is achieved when the person or the employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner licensed pursuant to this article 10 satisfactorily completes the approved training program.

If all controlling beneficial owners with day-to-day operational control of the licensed premises, all management personnel with responsibility for sales or the training of employees who engage in sales or other consumer interactions, and all employee licensees involved in the handling and sale of regulated marijuana of a medical marijuana business or a retail marijuana business licensed pursuant to this article 10 have a valid responsible vendor designation, the business is considered to have a responsible vendor designation. When a licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business is considered to have a responsible vendor designation and it hires a new employee or manager or has a new controlling beneficial owner that meets the requirements of this subsection (1)(c), the new employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner must have a valid responsible vendor designation or must successfully complete an approved training program within ninety days after being employed or becoming an owner in order for the medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business to maintain its responsible vendor designation. If a new employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner has a valid responsible vendor designation upon hire or becoming an owner, the licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business shall verify the designation within ninety days after employment begins.

A licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business that is considered to have a responsible vendor designation shall maintain information on all persons licensed pursuant to this article 10 who are in its employment and who have been trained in an approved training program. The information includes the date of the training program and the approved training program provider and a list of all licensed persons attending each specific training class, which class includes a training examination or assessment that demonstrates proficiency.

An employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner with a valid responsible vendor designation shall maintain information related to the designation, including the date of the training program and the approved training program provider.

If a local or state licensing authority initiates an administrative action against an employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner who has complied with the requirements of this section and has been designated a responsible vendor or a licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business that is considered to have a responsible vendor designation, the licensing authority shall consider the designation as a mitigating factor when imposing sanctions or penalties on the employee, manager, or controlling beneficial owner or licensed medical marijuana business or retail marijuana business.

Source:

L. 2019:

Entire article added with relocations, (SB 19-224), ch. 315, p. 2934, § 5, effective January 1, 2020.

L. 2022:

Entire section amended, (HB 22-1222), ch. 111, p. 504, § 1, effective January 1, 2023.

Editor's note:

This section is similar to former § 44-11-1102 as it existed prior to 2020.